Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.910

Effective date—1989 1st ex.s. c 9.

This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1989.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 825.]